Vermont, session 2025-2026, S42.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Generally * * *
Sec. 1. 33 V.S.A. § 1701 is amended to read:
§ 1701. SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
(a) The State of Vermont may shall participate in the federal Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) pursuant to 7 U.S.C. chapter 51. The
purpose of SNAP is to alleviate hunger and malnutrition among households
with low income by increasing their food purchasing power and access to
nutritious, safe food.
VT LEG #380009 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.42
2025 Page 2 of 4
* * *
* * * Restaurant Meals Program * * *
Sec. 2. 33 V.S.A. § 1704 is added to read:
§ 1704. RESTAURANT MEALS PROGRAM
(a) The State shall participate in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program’s Restaurant Meals Program. The Restaurant Meals Program shall be
administered by the Agency of Human Services, in consultation with the
Agency of Commerce and Community Development.
(b) Restaurant participation in the Restaurant Meals Program shall be
voluntary. The Agency of Human Services, in consultation with the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development, shall develop and publish on its
website a list of eligibility criteria for restaurant participation in the Restaurant
Meals Program, including that participating restaurants are licensed pursuant to
18 V.S.A. chapter 85. The eligibility criteria shall advance the following
goals:
(1) Locally produced foods are widely available to Restaurant Meals
Program clients.
(2) Restaurants serving foods that represent diverse cultural traditions
participate in the Restaurant Meals Program.
VT LEG #380009 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.42
2025 Page 3 of 4
(3) Participating restaurants are located in geographically diverse
regions of the State and in areas with significant populations of eligible
program participants.
(c) The Agency of Human Services, in consultation with the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development, shall provide technical assistance to
those restaurants applying to and participating in the Restaurant Meals
Program.
Sec. 3. ADOPTION OF RESTAURANT MEALS PROGRAM
The Agency of Human Services shall work in collaboration with the U.S.
Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition Service to adopt the
Restaurant Meals Program in Vermont pursuant to 33 V.S.A. § 1704.
Documents submitted to the Food and Nutrition Services shall include a
comprehensive implementation plan describing criteria for participating
restaurants and a template of the memorandum of understanding that shall be
used by the Agency and participating restaurants.
Sec. 4. POSITION AUTHORIZATION; APPROPRIATION; RESTAURANT
MEALS PROGRAM
(a) In fiscal year 2026, one new permanent classified position, Restaurant
Meals Program Coordinator, is authorized for establishment within the Agency
of Human Services.
VT LEG #380009 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.42
2025 Page 4 of 4
(b) In fiscal year 2026, $100,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Agency of Human Services to support the position established in
subsection (a) of this section. The position shall provide technical assistance to
restaurants applying to and participating in the Restaurant Meals Program
pursuant to Sec. 2 of this act and to Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program retailers generally.
(c) In fiscal year 2026, $75,000.00 is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Agency of Human Services to cover equipment and restaurant start-up
costs related to restaurant participation in the Restaurant Meals Program
pursuant to Sec. 2 of this act.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380009 v.2